Maine, session 132, LD866.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11152, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2021, c. 599, §11, is further
amended to read:
4. Landowner consideration. An antlerless deer permit lottery adopted by the
commissioner pursuant to this section may include a provision giving special consideration
to landowners who keep their lands open to hunting by the public. As part of the special
consideration to those landowners, the commissioner shall provide at least 25% of the
available antlerless deer permits in a wildlife management district at no cost to eligible
landowners that apply for an antlerless deer permit in that district. Any 2 or more areas of
land owned by the same person that are open for hunting and that would be contiguous
except for being divided by one or more roads are considered contiguous for the purposes
of determining landowner eligibility for special consideration under this subsection. If an
eligible landowner is unsuccessful in obtaining an antlerless deer permit through this
process but is successful in obtaining a permit through other means, that permit must be
provided to the landowner at no cost.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §11152, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 599, §11, is amended
to read:
9. Fee. The fee for an antlerless deer permit is $12 for residents and nonresidents,
except that a landowner who keeps the landowner's lands open to hunting by the public and
who successfully obtains an antlerless deer permit through the process outlined in
subsection 4 is entitled to receive one permit at no cost.